District of Columbia statutes.
49-1101.08

Graduation.

(a)

To facilitate the on-time graduation of children of military families, states and local education agencies shall adopt the following procedures:

(1)

Local education agency administrative officials shall waive specific courses required for graduation if similar course work has been satisfactorily completed in another local education agency or shall provide reasonable justification for the denial of a waiver. If a waiver is not granted to a student who would qualify to graduate from the sending school, the local education agency shall provide an alternative means for the student to acquire the required coursework so that his or her graduation may occur on time.

(2)

States shall accept:

(A)

Exit or end-of-course exams required for graduation from the sending state;

(B)

National norm referenced achievement tests; or

(C)

Alternative testing, in lieu of testing requirements for graduation in the receiving state. If the above-referenced alternatives cannot be accommodated by the receiving state for a student transferring in his or her senior year, then the provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall apply.

(b)

Should a military student transferring at the beginning or during his or her senior year be ineligible to graduate from the receiving local education agency after all alternatives have been considered, the sending and receiving local education agencies shall ensure the receipt of a diploma from the sending local education agency if the student meets the graduation requirements of the sending local education agency. If one of the states in question is not a member of this compact, the member state shall use its best efforts to facilitate the on-time graduation of the student in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-304, § 9, 60 DCR 2717